Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-308
Apportionable vehicle, defined.

(1) Apportionable vehicle means any motor vehicle or trailer used or intended for use in two or more member jurisdictions that allocate or proportionally register motor vehicles or trailers and used for the transportation of persons for hire or designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property.

(2) Apportionable vehicle does not include any recreational vehicle, motor vehicle displaying restricted plates, city pickup and delivery vehicle, or government-owned motor vehicle.

(3) An apportionable vehicle that is a power unit shall (a) have two axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds or eleven thousand seven hundred ninety-three and four hundred one thousandths kilograms, (b) have three or more axles, regardless of weight, or (c) be used in combination when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand pounds or eleven thousand seven hundred ninety-three and four hundred one thousandths kilograms gross vehicle weight. Vehicles or combinations of vehicles having a gross vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand pounds or eleven thousand seven hundred ninety-three and four hundred one thousandths kilograms or less and two-axle vehicles may be proportionally registered at the option of the registrant.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB177, § 1.